Maryland, session 2025, HB0188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0188*

HOUSE BILL 188
Article – State Finance and Procurement
SUBTITLE 7A. PROCUREMENT WITH SCRUTINIZED ENTITIES.
17–7A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “PUBLIC BODY” MEANS:
(1) THE STATE;
(2) A COUNTY, MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, OR OTHER POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION;
(3) A PUBLIC INSTRUMENTALITY; OR
(4) ANY GOVERNMENTAL UNIT AUTHORIZED TO AWARD A CONTRACT.
(C) (1) “SCRUTINIZED ENTITY” MEANS ANY ENTITY OWNED, OPERATED,
OR CONTROLLED BY THE GOVERNMENT OF A COUNTRY SUBJECT TO AN EMBARGO
UNDER THE FEDERAL INTERNATIONAL TRAFFIC IN ARMS REGULATIONS AND
LISTED UNDER 22 C.F.R. § 126.1(D)(1) OR (2).
(2) “SCRUTINIZED ENTITY” INCLUDES:
(I) A NATURAL PERSON, SOLE PROPRIETOR, CORPORATION,
COMPANY, LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, BUSINESS ASSOCIATION, PARTNERSHIP,
SOCIETY, TRUST, OR ANY OTHER NONGOVERNMENTAL ENTITY, ORGANIZATION, OR
GROUP;
(II) A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY OR INSTRUMENTALITY OF A
GOVERNMENT, INCLUDING A MULTILATERAL DEVELOPMENT INSTITUTION, AS
DEFINED BY THE FEDERAL INTERNATIONAL FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS ACT, 22
U.S.C. § 262R(C)(3); AND
(III) ANY PARENT, SUCCESSOR, SUBUNIT, OR DIRECT OR
INDIRECT SUBSIDIARY OF, OR ANY ENTITY UNDER COMMON OWNERSHIP OR
CONTROL WITH, AN ENTITY DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OR (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
17–7A–02.
A PERSON THAT, AT THE TIME OF BID OR PROPOSAL FOR A NEW CONTRACT OR
RENEWAL OF AN EXISTING CONTRACT, IS IDENTIFIED ON A LIST CREATED BY THE

HOUSE BILL 188 3
BOARD UNDER § 17–7A–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE AS A SCRUTINIZED ENTITY IS
INELIGIBLE TO AND MAY NOT BID ON, SUBMIT A PROPOSAL FOR, OR ENTER INTO OR
RENEW A CONTRACT WITH A PUBLIC BODY FOR GOODS OR SERVICES.
17–7A–03.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2025, THE BOARD SHALL USE
CREDIBLE INFORMATION AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC TO CREATE A LIST OF ANY
PERSONS THAT THE BOARD DETERMINES TO BE SCRUTINIZED ENTITIES.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL UPDATE THE LIST AT LEAST EVERY 180 DAYS.
(3) BEFORE THE BOARD INCLUDES A PERSON ON THE LIST, THE
BOARD SHALL PROVIDE THE PERSON WITH 90 DAYS’ WRITTEN NOTICE THAT:
(I) THE BOARD INTENDS TO INCLUDE THE PERSON ON THE
LIST; AND
(II) INCLUSION ON THE LIST WOULD MAKE THE PERSON
INELIGIBLE TO BID ON, SUBMIT A PROPOSAL FOR, OR ENTER INTO OR RENEW A
CONTRACT WITH A PUBLIC BODY FOR GOODS OR SERVICES.
(4) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL SPECIFY THAT IF THE PERSON CEASES TO BE A SCRUTINIZED
ENTITY, THE PERSON MAY BECOME ELIGIBLE FOR A FUTURE CONTRACT OR
CONTRACT RENEWAL WITH A PUBLIC BODY FOR GOODS OR SERVICES ON REMOVAL
FROM THE LIST.
(B) (1) THE BOARD SHALL PROVIDE A PERSON WITH AN OPPORTUNITY
TO COMMENT IN WRITING TO THE BOARD THAT THE PERSON IS NOT A SCRUTINIZED
ENTITY.
(2) IF THE PERSON DEMONSTRATES TO THE BOARD THAT THE
PERSON IS NOT A SCRUTINIZED ENTITY, THE BOARD MAY NOT INCLUDE THE PERSON
ON THE LIST.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL REMOVE A PERSON FROM THE LIST IF THE PERSON
DEMONSTRATES TO THE BOARD THAT THE PERSON IS NO LONGER A SCRUTINIZED
ENTITY.
(D) THE BOARD SHALL MAKE EVERY REASONABLE EFFORT TO AVOID
ERRONEOUSLY INCLUDING A PERSON ON THE LIST.

HOUSE BILL 188
(E) THE BOARD SHALL PUBLISH THE LIST REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION
ON THE INTERNET.
17–7A–04.
ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026, A PUBLIC BODY SHALL REQUIRE A PERSON
THAT SUBMITS A BID OR PROPOSAL TO THE PUBLIC BODY FOR A CONTRACT FOR
GOODS OR SERVICES, OR OTHERWISE PROPOSES TO ENTER INTO OR RENEW A
CONTRACT FOR GOODS OR SERVICES WITH THE PUBLIC BODY, TO CERTIFY AT THE
TIME THE BID IS SUBMITTED OR THE CONTRACT IS RENEWED THAT THE PERSON IS
NOT IDENTIFIED ON THE LIST CREATED BY THE BOARD AS A SCRUTINIZED ENTITY.
17–7A–05.
(A) (1) IF A PUBLIC BODY, USING CREDIBLE INFORMATION AVAILABLE TO
THE PUBLIC, DETERMINES THAT A PERSON HAS SUBMITTED A FALSE
CERTIFICATION UNDER § 17–7A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE PUBLIC BODY SHALL
PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE PERSON AND AN OPPORTUNITY FOR THE PERSON
TO DEMONSTRATE IN WRITING THAT THE PERSON IS NOT A SCRUTINIZED ENTITY.
(2) IF THE PERSON FAILS TO DEMONSTRATE TO THE PUBLIC BODY
WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE PUBLIC BODY PROVIDES NOTICE UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT THE PERSON IS NOT A SCRUTINIZED ENTITY, THE
PUBLIC BODY SHALL REPORT TO THE BOARD AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL:
(I) THE NAME OF THE PERSON DETERMINED TO HAVE
SUBMITTED A FALSE CERTIFICATION; AND
(II) THE INFORMATION ON WHICH THE PUBLIC BODY MADE ITS
DECISION.
(B) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY INSTITUTE AN ACTION AGAINST A
PERSON DETERMINED TO HAVE SUBMITTED A FALSE CERTIFICATION UNDER §
17–7A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE BROUGHT
WITHIN 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE CERTIFICATION IS MADE.
(C) IF, IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION, A COURT
DETERMINES THAT A PERSON SUBMITTED A FALSE CERTIFICATION:
(1) THE PERSON SHALL PAY ALL REASONABLE COSTS AND FEES
INCURRED IN THE CIVIL ACTION, INCLUDING:

HOUSE BILL 188 5
(I) ANY COSTS INCURRED BY THE PUBLIC BODY FOR THE
INVESTIGATION THAT LED TO THE FINDING OF THE FALSE CERTIFICATION; AND
(II) ALL REASONABLE COSTS AND FEES INCURRED BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL IN BRINGING THE ACTION;
(2) THE COURT MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY EQUAL TO THE
GREATER OF $250,000 OR TWICE THE AMOUNT OF THE CONTRACT FOR WHICH THE
FALSE CERTIFICATION WAS SUBMITTED;
(3) THE PUBLIC BODY SHALL TERMINATE THE CONTRACT FOR WHICH
THE FALSE CERTIFICATION WAS SUBMITTED; AND
(4) THE PERSON IS INELIGIBLE TO BID ON A CONTRACT WITH A
PUBLIC BODY FOR THE LATER OF:
(I) A PERIOD OF 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF THE COURT
ORDER; OR
(II) THE TIME AT WHICH THE PERSON CEASES TO BE A
SCRUTINIZED ENTITY.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN UNSUCCESSFUL BIDDER OR ANY OTHER PERSON MAY NOT PROTEST THE AWARD
OF A CONTRACT OR CONTRACT RENEWAL ON THE BASIS OF A FALSE CERTIFICATION.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT A
PUBLIC BODY FROM FILING A PROTEST OBJECTING TO THE AWARD OF A CONTRACT
OR CONTRACT RENEWAL ON THE BASIS OF A FALSE CERTIFICATION.
(E) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT CREATE OR AUTHORIZE A PRIVATE RIGHT OF
ACTION.
17–7A–06.
THIS SUBTITLE PREEMPTS ANY LAW, ORDINANCE, RULE, OR REGULATION OF
ANY LOCAL GOVERNING BODY INVOLVING PROCUREMENT CONTRACTS FOR GOODS
OR SERVICES WITH A PERSON WHO IS A SCRUTINIZED ENTITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) This Act shall remain in effect until federal law no longer authorizes the states
to adopt and enforce provisions of the type authorized under this Act.

HOUSE BILL 188
(b) The Board of Public Works shall notify the Department of Legislative Services
within 5 days after the federal government enacts a law described in subsection (a) of this
section and, as of the date the law becomes effective, this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.